3rdParty/snowball/algorithms/portuguese/stem_MS_DOS_Latin_I.sbl
routines (
           prelude postlude mark_regions
           RV R1 R2
           standard_suffix
           verb_suffix
           residual_suffix
           residual_form
)

externals ( stem )

integers ( pV p1 p2 )

groupings ( v )

stringescapes {}

/* special characters (in MS-DOS Latin I) */

stringdef a'   hex 'A0'  // a-acute
stringdef a^   hex '83'  // a-circumflex e.g. 'bota^nico
stringdef e'   hex '82'  // e-acute
stringdef e^   hex '88'  // e-circumflex
stringdef i'   hex 'A1'  // i-acute
stringdef o^   hex '93'  // o-circumflex
stringdef o'   hex 'A2'  // o-acute
stringdef u'   hex 'A3'  // u-acute
stringdef c,   hex '87'  // c-cedilla

stringdef a~   hex 'C6'  // a-tilde
stringdef o~   hex 'E4'  // o-tilde


define v 'aeiou{a'}{e'}{i'}{o'}{u'}{a^}{e^}{o^}'

define prelude as repeat (
    [substring] among(
        '{a~}' (<- 'a~')
        '{o~}' (<- 'o~')
        ''     (next)
    ) //or next
)

define mark_regions as (

    $pV = limit
    $p1 = limit
    $p2 = limit  // defaults

    do (
        ( v (non-v gopast v) or (v gopast non-v) )
        or
        ( non-v (non-v gopast v) or (v next) )
        setmark pV
    )
    do (
        gopast v gopast non-v setmark p1
        gopast v gopast non-v setmark p2
    )
)

define postlude as repeat (
    [substring] among(
        'a~' (<- '{a~}')
        'o~' (<- '{o~}')
        ''   (next)
    ) //or next
)

backwardmode (

    define RV as $pV <= cursor
    define R1 as $p1 <= cursor
    define R2 as $p2 <= cursor

    define standard_suffix as (
        [substring] among(

            'eza' 'ezas'
            'ico' 'ica' 'icos' 'icas'
            'ismo' 'ismos'
            '{a'}vel'
            '{i'}vel'
            'ista' 'istas'
            'oso' 'osa' 'osos' 'osas'
            'amento' 'amentos'
            'imento' 'imentos'

           'adora' 'ador' 'a{c,}a~o'
           'adoras' 'adores' 'a{c,}o~es'  // no -ic test
           'ante' 'antes' '{a^}ncia' // Note 1
            (
                R2 delete
            )
            'logia'
            'logias'
            (
                R2 <- 'log'
            )
            'u{c,}a~o' 'u{c,}o~es'
            (
                R2 <- 'u'
            )
            '{e^}ncia' '{e^}ncias'
            (
                R2 <- 'ente'
            )
            'amente'
            (
                R1 delete
                try (
                    [substring] R2 delete among(
                        'iv' (['at'] R2 delete)
                        'os'
                        'ic'
                        'ad'
                    )
                )
            )
            'mente'
            (
                R2 delete
                try (
                    [substring] among(
                        'ante' // Note 1
                        'avel'
                        '{i'}vel' (R2 delete)
                    )
                )
            )
            'idade'
            'idades'
            (
                R2 delete
                try (
                    [substring] among(
                        'abil'
                        'ic'
                        'iv'   (R2 delete)
                    )
                )
            )
            'iva' 'ivo'
            'ivas' 'ivos'
            (
                R2 delete
                try (
                    ['at'] R2 delete // but not a further   ['ic'] R2 delete
                )
            )
            'ira' 'iras'
            (
                RV 'e'  // -eira -eiras usually non-verbal
                <- 'ir'
            )
        )
    )

    define verb_suffix as setlimit tomark pV for (
        [substring] among(
            'ada' 'ida' 'ia' 'aria' 'eria' 'iria' 'ar{a'}' 'ara' 'er{a'}'
            'era' 'ir{a'}' 'ava' 'asse' 'esse' 'isse' 'aste' 'este' 'iste'
            'ei' 'arei' 'erei' 'irei' 'am' 'iam' 'ariam' 'eriam' 'iriam'
            'aram' 'eram' 'iram' 'avam' 'em' 'arem' 'erem' 'irem' 'assem'
            'essem' 'issem' 'ado' 'ido' 'ando' 'endo' 'indo' 'ara~o'
            'era~o' 'ira~o' 'ar' 'er' 'ir' 'as' 'adas' 'idas' 'ias'
            'arias' 'erias' 'irias' 'ar{a'}s' 'aras' 'er{a'}s' 'eras'
            'ir{a'}s' 'avas' 'es' 'ardes' 'erdes' 'irdes' 'ares' 'eres'
            'ires' 'asses' 'esses' 'isses' 'astes' 'estes' 'istes' 'is'
            'ais' 'eis' '{i'}eis' 'ar{i'}eis' 'er{i'}eis' 'ir{i'}eis'
            '{a'}reis' 'areis' '{e'}reis' 'ereis' '{i'}reis' 'ireis'
            '{a'}sseis' '{e'}sseis' '{i'}sseis' '{a'}veis' 'ados' 'idos'
            '{a'}mos' 'amos' '{i'}amos' 'ar{i'}amos' 'er{i'}amos'
            'ir{i'}amos' '{a'}ramos' '{e'}ramos' '{i'}ramos' '{a'}vamos'
            'emos' 'aremos' 'eremos' 'iremos' '{a'}ssemos' '{e^}ssemos'
            '{i'}ssemos' 'imos' 'armos' 'ermos' 'irmos' 'eu' 'iu' 'ou'

            'ira' 'iras'
                (delete)
        )
    )

    define residual_suffix as (
        [substring] among(
            'os'
            'a' 'i' 'o' '{a'}' '{i'}' '{o'}'
                ( RV delete )
        )
    )

    define residual_form as (
        [substring] among(
            'e' '{e'}' '{e^}'
                ( RV delete [('u'] test 'g') or
                             ('i'] test 'c') RV delete )
            '{c,}' (<-'c')
        )
    )
)

define stem as (
    do prelude
    do mark_regions
    backwards (
        do (
            ( ( standard_suffix or verb_suffix )
              and do ( ['i'] test 'c' RV delete )
            )
            or residual_suffix
        )
        do residual_form
    )
    do postlude
)

/*
    Note 1: additions of 15 Jun 2005
*/
